ani_adverbs_formation.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ADJECTIVES
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS

Adverb_no_class [<ADV>:]
Adverb_class_suffix [<ADV>:] [>:>] agrCl
Adverb_class_suffix [<ADV>:] [>:>] agrCl
agrCl [>:>] Adverb_class_prefix [<ADV>:]
agrCl[m] [>:>] [:у] Adverb_class_prefix_i_u [<ADV>:]
agrCl[-m,-pl] [>:>] [:и] Adverb_class_prefix_i_u [<ADV>:]
agrCl[-sg] [>:>] [:о] Adverb_class_prefix_i_u [<ADV>:]
Adverb_class_internal(1) :agrCl Adverb_class_internal(2) [<ADV>:] agrCl:
agrCl [>:>] Adverb_class_prefix_and_internal(1) :agrCl Adverb_class_prefix_and_internal(2) [<ADV>:] agrCl:
agrCl [>:>] Adverb_class_prefix_and_internals(1) :agrCl Adverb_class_prefix_and_internals(2) :agrCl Adverb_class_prefix_and_internals(3) [<ADV>:] agrCl:

LEXICON agrCl

<m>:в[m]
<f>:й
<an><sg>:б[sg]
<an><pl>:й[pl]
<inan1>:б
<inan2>:р
